Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20132-3982.01
Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance
requirements; facility in existence prior to July 1, 2013; other facilities;
requirements applicable.

A facility producing milk for manufacturing purposes in
existence prior to July 1, 2013, which does not meet all of the requirements
of the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance shall be acceptable for use only
if it meets the requirements of sections 2-3983 to 2-3989. After July 1, 2013,
all new facilities that produce milk and facilities that produce milk that
are under new ownership shall be required to meet the requirements of the
Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance.

Laws 2013, LB67, § 9.
March 8, 2013